FST/hsi/phonetize_hsi_num.xfst
define vowel ā|a|e|i|o|u;
define consonant b|c|č|čʰ|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|pʰ|q|r|ṛ|s|š|t|tʰ|v|w|x|y|z;

! define gender vowel -> i || _ "^",, e -> i,, o -> i;

regex %+NUM -> "^",,
	%+MASC -> 0,,
	%+SG -> 0,,
	%+PL -> 0;
